Washington statutes.
RCW 11.90.470

Application.

(1) This chapter applies to guardianship and protective proceedings filed on or after January 1, 2010.

(2) RCW 11.90.010 through 11.90.060 and 11.90.400 through 11.90.460 apply to proceedings filed before January 1, 2010, regardless of whether a guardianship or protective order has been issued.

[ 2009 c 81 s 23.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 81: See note following RCW 11.90.010.